District of Columbia statutes.
31-4706

Extension of time for payment of premiums.

A life company may enter into subsequent agreements in writing with the insured, which need not be attached to the policy, to extend the time for the payment of any premium, or part thereof, upon condition that failure to comply with the terms of such agreement shall lapse the policy, as provided in said agreement or in the policy. Subject to such lien as may be created to secure any indebtedness contracted by the insured, in consideration of such extension, said agreement shall not impair any right existing under the policy.

History

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1164, ch. 672, ch. V, § 6

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-510.
1973 Ed., § 35-706.